Utah statutes.
53A-11a-202.   Retaliation and making false allegation prohibited.

(1)  No school employee or student may engage in retaliation against:

(a)  a school employee;

(b)  a student; or

(c)  an investigator for, or a witness of, an alleged incident of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, or retaliation.

(2)  No school employee or student may make a false allegation of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, or retaliation against a school employee or student.

